Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE A. PROVISIONS APPLYING TO HEALTH PROFESSIONS GENERALLY

CHAPTER 114. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS APPLICABLE TO MULTIPLE HEALTH OCCUPATION REGULATORY AGENCIES

Sec. 114.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Health care practitioner" means an individual issued a license, certificate, registration, title, permit, or other authorization to engage in a health care profession.

(2) "Health occupation regulatory agency" means a department, commission, board, office, authority, or other agency of the state that regulates a health care practitioner under this title.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 512 (S.B. 1058), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 114.002. ANNUAL REPORT TO LEGISLATURE. (a) Not later than February 1 of each year, each health occupation regulatory agency shall file a report with the chairs of the house and senate committees with primary oversight over the agency that includes the following:

(1) the number of persons regulated by the agency;

(2) the number of persons who became subject to regulation by the agency in the previous year;

(3) the number of persons regulated by the agency by county;

(4) a description of any complaints reported to the agency or a description of the complaint categories used by the agency and the number of complaints in each category;

(5) the number of complaints investigated by the agency and a description of the final resolution of the complaints;

(6) the amount of fees collected by the agency each year;

(7) the expenses of the agency; and

(8) any unfunded needs of the agency.

(b) The Health Professions Council shall adopt a standard format that must be used by health occupation regulatory agencies to report the information required under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 512 (S.B. 1058), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.